Utah statutes.
48-1d-905.   Liability after dissolution.

(1)  If a partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a partnership to incur an obligation under Subsection 48-1d-904(1) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership's activities and affairs, the partner is liable:

(a)  to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

(b)  if another partner or person dissociated as a partner is liable for the obligation, to that other partner or person for any damage caused to that other partner or person arising from the liability.

(2)  If a person dissociated as a partner causes a partnership to incur an obligation under Subsection 48-1d-904(2), the person is liable:

(a)  to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

(b)  if a partner or another person dissociated as a partner is liable for the obligation, to the partner or other person for any damage caused to the partner or other person arising from the obligation.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

